California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
(c) Fix and revise from time to time and charge and collect tolls and other charges described in Section 31474.

(d) Acquire by dedication, gift, purchase, or eminent domain, and hold and dispose of any interests in property whether real or personal in the exercise of its powers and the performance of its duties under this chapter.

(e) Establish and enforce policies, rules, and regulations for the administration, operation, and maintenance of facilities and services.

(f) Pledge all or any part of the toll revenues to secure bonds and any repayment or reimbursement obligations of SANDAG to any provider of bond insurance or letter of credit or line of credit facility determined to be appropriate by SANDAG to provide for the payment of debt service on any bonds of SANDAG, and the state hereby pledges to, and agrees with, the holders of bonds that the state will not limit, alter, or restrict the rights hereby vested in SANDAG to fulfill each pledge of toll revenues and any other terms of any agreement made with or for the benefit of the holders of bonds or in any way impair the rights or remedies of the holders of the bonds or the providers of bond insurance or letter of credit or line of credit facilities.

(g) Do all acts necessary and convenient for
 the full exercise of the powers granted in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 422, Sec. 3.   (SB 985)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

31467.

(a) Highway projects constructed pursuant to the act shall, at all times following construction, be owned by the department. International port of entry facilities constructed pursuant to the act, or the land on which those facilities will be constructed, shall, at SANDAG’s option, be owned either by the federal government or by SANDAG. If SANDAG chooses to own the land or facilities, it shall lease them to a federal agency. Unless prohibited by law, all other property and facilities constructed pursuant to this chapter shall be owned by SANDAG, unless transferred to a state or federal agency upon agreement between SANDAG and the relevant agency. Any department property conveyed to either SANDAG or the
 federal government pursuant to this section shall be conveyed free of charge and only upon a finding by the California Transportation Commission that the conveyance is in the state’s interest.

(b) The plans and specifications for a transportation project developed, maintained, repaired, rehabilitated, reconstructed, or operated pursuant to the act shall comply with the relevant standards of the department for state transportation projects. Ports of entry projects shall meet the relevant federal agency’s published design standards and legal requirements. SANDAG may approve the location, design, and the materials of construction for a project constructed pursuant to this chapter after consultation with the department or the relevant federal agency, as applicable.

(c) SANDAG
 shall carry out its highway projects in cooperation with the department and shall consult the department in the operation of a project and on matters related to highway design and construction.

(d) For the purpose of facilitating a project, the agreements between SANDAG and other entities may include provisions for the lease of rights-of-way in, and airspace over or under, highways, public streets, rail, or related facilities for the granting of necessary easements, and for the issuance of permits or other authorizations to enable the construction or operation of a project.

(e) Agreements between SANDAG, appropriate local, state, or federal agencies, or any other entity may be executed to identify the respective obligations and liabilities of one or more of those entities and assign
 them responsibilities relating to a project. The agreements entered into pursuant to this section shall be consistent with agreements between the department and the United States Department of Transportation relating to a project and may include procedures for enforcement by the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(f) Any project utilizing the department’s services shall be included in the department’s capital outlay support program for workload purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 422, Sec. 4.   (SB 985)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

31468.

(a) The Legislature has recognized the merits of alternative project delivery methods in the past by authorizing their use for projects undertaken by school districts, the University of California, specified local government projects, state office buildings, and public transit projects.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide optional, alternative procedures for delivering the project and its components pursuant to this act. SANDAG may enter into an alternative project delivery method contract authorized in this section on a project or any project component, after comparison of the traditional design, bid, and build process of construction with the proposed alternative
 project delivery method in a public meeting, if the governing board makes written findings that use of an alternative project delivery method on the specific project or project component under consideration will accomplish at least one of the following objectives: reduce comparable project costs, expedite a project’s completion, or provide features not achievable through the traditional design-bid-build method.

(c) SANDAG may utilize the following alternative project delivery methods if the conditions in this section are met:

(1) Design-build.

(2) Design sequencing.

(3) Construction Manager/General Contractor (CMGC).

(d) (1) If a contract for CMGC services is entered into pursuant to this chapter and includes preconstruction services by the construction manager, SANDAG shall enter into a written contract with the construction manager for the preconstruction services, under which SANDAG shall pay the construction manager a fee for preconstruction services in an amount agreed upon by SANDAG and the construction manager. The preconstruction services contract may include fees for services to be performed during the contract period, provided that SANDAG shall not request or obtain a fixed price or a guaranteed maximum price for the construction contract from the construction manager or enter into a construction contract with the construction manager until after SANDAG has entered into a services contract. A preconstruction services contract shall provide for the subsequent negotiation for
 construction of all or any discrete phase or phases of the project and shall provide for SANDAG to own the design plans and other preconstruction services work products.

(2) A contract for construction services may be awarded after the plans have been sufficiently developed and either a fixed price or a guaranteed maximum price has been successfully negotiated. In the event that a fixed price or a guaranteed maximum price is not successfully negotiated, SANDAG may award the contract for construction services utilizing any other procurement method authorized by law.

(3) The construction manager shall perform not less than 30 percent of the work covered by the fixed price or guaranteed maximum price agreement reached. Work that is not performed directly by the construction manager
 shall be bid to subcontractors pursuant to Section 6955 of the Public Contract Code.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that alternative project delivery methods as authorized in this section shall not be construed to extend, limit, or change in any manner the legal responsibility of public agencies and contractors to comply with existing laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 163, Sec. 2.   (AB 427)   Effective September 8, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

31472.

This chapter does not authorize SANDAG or the department to do either of the following:

(a) Lease or otherwise convey a toll road to a private-sector entity.

(b) Convert any existing nontoll or non-user-fee highway lane into a tolled or user-fee highway lane, except in the corridor or as otherwise permitted by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 422, Sec. 6.   (SB 985)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

31473.

(a) The cities and county in the San Diego region are authorized and empowered to lease, lend, grant, or convey to SANDAG at its request upon such terms and conditions as the city or county considers reasonable and fair and without the necessity for any advertisement, order of court, or other action of formality, other than the regular and formal action of the governing body of the cities or county, any real property that may be necessary or convenient to the effectuation of the authorized purposes of SANDAG, including public highways and other real property already devoted to public use.

(b) If a reasonable price cannot be agreed upon, or if the owner is legally incapacitated, absent, unknown, or unable to convey valid title, SANDAG is hereby authorized and empowered to acquire by condemnation or by the exercise of the power of eminent domain any lands, property, rights, rights-of-way, easements, and other property, including highways or parkways, or parts thereof or rights therein, of any person, copartnership, association, railroad, public service, public utility or other corporation, municipality, or political subdivision considered necessary or convenient for the construction, repair, or improvement or the efficient operation of a project or necessary in restoration of public or private property damaged or destroyed, but not including any of the rights of any franchisee, lessee, or owner of airspace rights in the demonstration toll road project known as State Route 125 in the County of San Diego.

 (c) Any proceedings pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be conducted in accordance with and subject to the relocation assistance guidelines in Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 7260) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code. Title to any property acquired by SANDAG shall be taken in the name of SANDAG or the department.

(d) If the owner, lessee, or occupier of any property to be condemned refuses to remove his or her personal property from the property or give up possession of the property, SANDAG may proceed to obtain possession in any manner now or hereafter provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 720, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

31474.

(a) SANDAG may only impose tolls under this chapter for entrance to or the use of the corridor. To the extent provided in an agreement under Section 31483, this restriction does not apply to any toll, portion of a toll, or portion of toll revenue transferred by SANDAG to another party to an agreement under Section 31483. This subdivision does not limit uses of toll revenue authorized by this chapter.

(b) SANDAG shall review the adequacy of the toll rates established to cover the aggregate costs of all projects within two years following the opening of the initial project to be supported by toll revenue under this chapter and at least biennially
 after the initial review for so long as SANDAG imposes tolls under this chapter.

(c) (1) SANDAG’s toll structure may include discounts and premiums to encourage efficient use of projects and reduction of congestion and emission of greenhouse gases, including, without limitation, discounts for high-occupancy vehicles, electronic toll collection, and off-peak travel, and premiums for on-peak travel.

(2) SANDAG shall revise or eliminate any free or reduced-rate toll rate schedule adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) as necessary to ensure compliance with obligations described in subdivisions (b) and (f).

(d) SANDAG’s toll structure may include adjustments to toll rates to reflect economic factors,
 including, but not limited to, the Consumer Price Index or other cost indices.

(e) SANDAG’s toll structure shall reflect the toll setting policies and procedures set forth in any agreement under Section 31483.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, tolls under this chapter shall be maintained at rates sufficient to meet any obligation secured by a pledge of revenues under this chapter, and covenants set forth in any related resolution, indenture, or constituent instrument.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 422, Sec. 7.   (SB 985)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

31475.

(a) Toll revenues under this chapter may be used to reimburse or finance the costs incurred in connection with the implementation, construction, maintenance, or operation of a project, including reimbursement of federal funds specifically allocated to SANDAG for a project or projects by the federal government or other funds from funding sources that are not otherwise available to state agencies for transportation-related projects. SANDAG shall be reimbursed for administrative costs in an amount that shall not exceed 3 percent of toll revenues under this chapter.

(b) Toll revenues shall be used to pay for costs in the following categories:

(1) Payments pursuant to bonds and resolutions, indentures, and other constituent instruments defining the rights of the holders of bonds and any repayment or reimbursement obligations of SANDAG to any providers of bond insurance or letters of credit or lines of credit related to bonds.

(2) SANDAG costs for operations, toll collection, and administration of the projects.

(3) Reimbursement or payment to federal, state, and local agencies for costs incurred by or payable to those agencies for services, equipment, goods, fixtures, operation, maintenance,
 personnel, or software provided to or in furtherance of a project that are reimbursable pursuant to a written agreement between SANDAG and the respective agency.

(4) Costs for capital improvements to repair or rehabilitate a project, to expand project capacity, to improve project operations, or to increase public transit and nonmotorized options in the corridor.

(5) Costs for projects that increase transportation options along the corridor or at the Otay Mesa East Port of Entry, including, but not limited to, public transit and nonmotorized transportation that would result in reduced vehicle miles traveled, pursuant to the plan approved by the board pursuant to subdivision (b)
 of Section 31476 that specifies the expenditure of toll revenues.

(6) Payments pursuant to an agreement under Section 31483.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 422, Sec. 8.   (SB 985)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

31476.

(a) At least 30 days prior to setting the initial toll rates for a project, and thereafter when adjustments to the toll rates are proposed, the board shall provide a public comment period regarding the proposed rates. The board shall also take public testimony at one or more public meetings during this time period.

(b) The expenditure plan for toll revenues shall be updated and approved by the board on an annual basis beginning on July 1 following implementation of a toll. Approval of the initial and annual expenditure plan shall take place at a public meeting held by the board following a notice of at least 30 days to the public.

(c) Collection of tolls under this chapter shall cease following repayment of the bonds and other project costs in full unless an extension of the time for toll collection is approved by a two-thirds vote of the board at a public meeting following a notice of at least 30 days to the public.

(d) The board shall arrange for a postaudit of the toll revenues expended pursuant to this chapter to be made at least annually by a certified public accountant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 422, Sec. 9.   (SB 985)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

31477.

(a) SANDAG may enter into one or more agreements with the County of San Diego or a city within the County of San Diego to accept fees imposed by that city or the county pursuant to the Subdivision Map Act (Division 2 (commencing with Section 66410) of Title 7 of the Government Code) or the Mitigation Fee Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 66000), Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 66010), Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 66012), Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 66016), and Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 66020) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code), to reimburse SANDAG for costs it has or will incur to mitigate development that will have a negative impact on the movement of people or
 goods in or along the State Route 11 corridor or the Otay Mesa East Port of Entry.

(b) Fees paid to a city or the county and transferred to SANDAG pursuant to this section shall be expended by SANDAG solely for the construction or reimbursement for construction of the improvement serving the area to be benefited and from which the fees transferred from the city or county were collected.

(c) The agreement may provide for the acceptance of considerations in lieu of the payment of fees.

(d) If the provisions of this section, or provisions implementing this section contained in any ordinance adopted pursuant to this section, are held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions of this section or of the ordinance
 adopted pursuant thereto, which can be given effect without the invalid provision, and to this end the provisions of this section and of an ordinance adopted pursuant thereto are severable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 422, Sec. 10.   (SB 985)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

31481.

(a) SANDAG may, from time to time, issue bonds in accordance with the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code) for any of the purposes authorized by this chapter. SANDAG shall constitute a “local agency” within the meaning of Section 54307 of the Government Code. The operation of SANDAG projects or any grouping or units thereof shall constitute an “enterprise” within the meaning of that section.

(b) Article 3 (commencing with Section 54380) of Chapter 6 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code does not apply to the issuance and sale of bonds pursuant to this chapter and SANDAG shall authorize the issuance of such bonds by resolution of its board.

(c) Any bond issued pursuant to this section shall contain on its face a statement to the following effect: “Neither the full faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State of California is pledged to the payment of principal of, or the interest of this bond.”

(d) SANDAG may bring an action to determine the validity of any of its bonds pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(e) Before issuing any new or increased toll revenue bonds, the board shall conduct at least one public meeting following at least 30 days’ notice to the public at which public testimony shall be taken regarding the proposed bond issuance. Issuance of new or increased toll revenue bonds pursuant to this act shall require approval by at least two-thirds of the board’s voting members.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 720, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

31482.

(a) SANDAG, its income and property, all bonds issued by it, and the interest on the bonds are exempt from all taxation by this state or any political subdivision of this state.

(b) Bonds issued by SANDAG are legal investments for all trust funds, the funds of all insurance companies, banks, trust companies, executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries. The bonds are securities that may legally be deposited with, and received by, any state or municipal officer or agency or political subdivision of the state for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or obligation of the state is now, or may hereafter be, authorized by law, including deposits to secure public funds.

(c) Nothing in this chapter is intended to infringe upon the rights of the state to make transportation improvements that may impact use of transportation facilities in the corridor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 720, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

31483.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(1) Cooperative tolling arrangements can further reduce congestion and wait times at the border and thereby reduce commercial and noncommercial vehicle emissions.

(2) Streamlined cross-border tolling arrangements will preserve public revenues for both the north side and the south side of the Otay Mesa East Port of Entry by providing for a more efficient border region transportation system.

(b) SANDAG shall have and may exercise all rights and powers, expressed or implied, that are
 necessary to carry out the purposes and intent of this chapter, including the power to do both of the following:

(1) By agreement, exercise one or more of SANDAG’s powers to impose and collect tolls, acquire, operate, and maintain tolling facilities, and related powers under this chapter jointly with the tolling powers of one or more of the federal government of Mexico or a governmental agency or unit thereof.

(2) Contract with one or more of the federal government of Mexico or a governmental agency or unit thereof to receive from or provide to the other contracting parties toll collection and remittance functions and services.

(c) Any agreement authorized pursuant subdivision (b) may include provisions to limit or
 restrict all of the following:

(1) Toll collection to one side of the Otay Mesa East Port of Entry.

(2) Equitable allocation of toll revenues collected by a party to another party or make payments from toll revenues in consideration of covenants made or other value contributed.

(3) Equitable allocation and financing of the operating, maintenance, and capital costs, including financing costs.

(4) Sharing of information regarding toll collections and revenues and information regarding traffic at or near the Otay Mesa East Port of Entry and approaching roadways.

(5) Investment of funds.

(6) Establishment of policies and procedures for toll rate setting in accordance with this chapter. 

(7) The time and manner of termination, unwinding, and distribution of property upon termination. 

(8) Allocation of liabilities and indemnity.

(9) The adjudication of disputes or disagreements.

(10) The manner that strict accountability of funds will be provided for and auditing.

(11) Other provisions that would enhance the efficiency border crossings at the Otay Mesa East Port of Entry or tolling as well as any other necessary and proper
 matters agreed upon by the parties.

(d) Toll revenues paid or allocated to a party other than SANDAG under an agreement pursuant this section shall not be subject to the restrictions of this chapter upon transfer to the other party in accordance with the agreement.

(e) This section may only be implemented consistent with federal law, including obtaining any required federal approvals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 422, Sec. 11.   (SB 985)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Electronic Toll Collection and Electronic Transit Fare Collection Systems [31490. - 31490.]

31490.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a transportation agency may not sell or otherwise provide to any other person or entity personally identifiable information of any person who subscribes to an electronic toll or electronic transit fare collection system or who uses a toll bridge, toll lane, or toll highway that employs an electronic toll collection system.

(b) A transportation agency that employs an electronic toll collection or an electronic transit fare collection system shall establish a privacy policy regarding the collection and use of personally identifiable information and provide to subscribers of that system a copy of the privacy policy in a manner that is conspicuous and meaningful, such as by providing a copy to the subscriber with the
 transponder, electronic transit pass, or other device used as an electronic toll or transit fare collection mechanism, or, if the system does not use a mechanism, with the application materials. A transportation agency shall conspicuously post its privacy policy on its internet website. For purposes of this subdivision, “conspicuously post” has the same meaning as that term is defined in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 22577 of the Business and Professions Code. The policy shall include, but need not be limited to, a description of the following:

(1) The types of personally identifiable information that is collected by the agency.

(2) The categories of third-party persons or entities with whom the agency may share personally identifiable information.

(3) The process by which a
 transportation agency notifies subscribers of material changes to its privacy policy.

(4) The effective date of the privacy policy.

(5) The process by which a subscriber may review and request changes to any of the subscriber’s personally identifiable information.

(c) A transportation agency may, within practical business and cost constraints, store only personally identifiable information of a person such as, to the extent applicable, the account name, credit card number, billing address, vehicle information, and other basic account information required to perform account functions such as billing, account settlement, or enforcement activities. All other information shall be discarded no more than four years and six months after the billing cycle has concluded, the bill has been paid, and all toll or fare
 violations, if applicable, have been resolved.

(d) A transportation agency shall make every effort, within practical business and cost constraints, to purge the personal account information of an account that is closed or terminated. In no case shall a transportation agency maintain personal information more than four years and six months after the date an account is closed or terminated.

(e) (1) Except as authorized in paragraphs (2) and (3), a transportation agency may make personally identifiable information of a person available to a law enforcement agency only pursuant to a search warrant. Absent a provision in the search warrant to the contrary, the law enforcement agency shall immediately, but in any event within no more than five days, notify the person that the person’s records have been obtained and shall provide the person with a copy of the search
 warrant and the identity of the law enforcement agency or peace officer to whom the records were provided.

(2) This section does not prohibit a peace officer, as defined in Section 830.1 or 830.2 of the Penal Code, when conducting a criminal or traffic collision investigation, from obtaining personally identifiable information of a person if the officer has good cause to believe that a delay in obtaining this information by seeking a search warrant would cause an adverse result, as defined in subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1524.2 of the Penal Code.

(3) This section does not prohibit a transportation agency that employs an electronic toll collection system from providing the date, time, and location of a vehicle license plate read captured by the system to a peace officer, as defined in Section 830.1 or 830.2 of the Penal Code,
 in response to an alert pursuant to Section 8594, 8594.5, 8594.10, 8594.11, 8594.13, 8594.14, or 8594.15 of the Government Code containing a license plate number of a vehicle.

(f) This section does not prohibit a transportation agency in subdivision (a) from providing aggregated traveler information derived from collective data that relates to a group or category of persons from which personally identifiable information has been removed.

(g) This section does not prohibit a transportation agency, with respect to an electronic toll collection system, from providing the license plate number of an intermodal chassis to the owner of the chassis for purposes of locating the driver of the chassis in the event the driver fails to pay a toll.

(h) This section, with respect to an electronic toll collection system, does not
 prohibit a transportation agency from sharing data with another transportation agency solely to comply with interoperability specifications and standards adopted pursuant to Section 27565 regarding electronic toll collection devices and technologies. A third-party vendor may not use personally identifiable information obtained under this subdivision for a purpose other than described in this subdivision.

(i) Subdivision (d) shall not prohibit a transportation agency, or its designee, from performing financial and accounting functions such as billing, account settlement, enforcement, or other financial activities required to operate and manage the electronic toll collection system or transit fare collection system. This section, with respect to electronic transit fare collection systems, does not prohibit the sharing of data between transportation agencies for the purpose of interoperability between those agencies. A third-party vendor may not
 use personally identifiable information obtained under this subdivision for a purpose other than as described in this subdivision.

(j) This section does not prohibit a transportation agency from communicating, either directly or through a contracted third-party vendor, to subscribers of an electronic toll collection system or an electronic transit fare collection system about products and services offered by, the agency, a business partner, or the entity with which it contracts for the system, using personally identifiable information limited to the subscriber’s name, address, and email address, provided that the transportation agency has received the subscriber’s express written consent to receive the communications.

(k) A transportation agency may not use a nonsubscriber’s personally identifiable information obtained using an electronic toll collection or electronic transit fare
 collection system to market products or services to that nonsubscriber. This subdivision shall not apply to toll-related products or services contained in a notice of toll evasion issued pursuant to Section 23302 of the Vehicle Code.

(l) For purposes of this section, “transportation agency” means the Department of Transportation, the Bay Area Toll Authority, any entity operating a toll bridge, toll lane, or toll highway within the state, any entity administering an electronic transit fare collection system and any transit operator participating in that system, or any entity under contract with any of the above entities.

(m) For purposes of this section, “electronic toll collection system” is a system where a transponder, camera-based vehicle identification system, or other electronic medium is used to deduct payment of a toll from a subscriber’s account or to establish an
 obligation to pay a toll, and “electronic transit fare collection system” means a system for issuing an electronic transit pass that enables a transit passenger subscriber to use the transit systems of one or more participating transit operators without having to pay individual fares, where fares are instead deducted from the subscriber’s account as loaded onto the electronic transit pass.

(n) For purposes of this section, “person” means any person who subscribes to an electronic toll collection or electronic transit fare collection system or any person who uses a toll bridge, toll lane, or toll road that employs an electronic toll collection system.

(o) For purposes of this section, “personally identifiable information” means any information that identifies or describes a person, including, but not limited to, travel pattern data, address, telephone number, email address, license
 plate number, photograph, bank account information, or credit card number. For purposes of this section, with respect to electronic transit fare collection systems, “personally identifiable information” does not include photographic or video footage.

(p) For purposes of this section, “interoperability” means the sharing of data, including personally identifiable information, across multiple transportation agencies for the sole purpose of creating an integrated transit fare payment system, integrated toll payment system, or both.

(q) (1) In addition to any other remedies provided by law, a person whose personally identifiable information has been knowingly sold or otherwise provided in violation of this section may bring an action to recover either actual damages or two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each individual violation, whichever is greater,
 and may also recover reasonable costs and attorney’s fees.

(2) A person whose personally identifiable information has been knowingly sold or otherwise provided three or more times in violation of this section may bring an action to recover either actual damages or four thousand dollars ($4,000) for each individual violation, whichever is greater, and may also recover reasonable costs and attorney’s fees.

(r) Nothing in subdivisions (c) and (d) shall preclude compliance with a court order or settlement agreement that has been approved on or before April 25, 2010.

(s) A transportation agency that employs an electronic toll collection or electronic transit fare collection system may impose an administrative fee on persons who use those systems in an amount sufficient to cover the cost of implementing this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 182.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 18. PARKING [31500. - 36745.]



PART 1. VEHICLE PARKING DISTRICT LAW OF 1943 [31500. - 31933.]



  CHAPTER 1. General [31500. - 31519.]

31500.

This part may be cited as the Vehicle Parking District Law of 1943.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31502.

As used in this part, “parking places” includes parking lots, garages, buildings, and other improvements for the parking of motor vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

31503.

As used in this part, “legislative body” means:

(a) When used with reference to a county, the board of supervisors.

(b) When used with reference to a city, the body which by law constitutes the legislative department of the government of the city.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

31504.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires, “city” includes city, county, and city and county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

31505.

As used in this part, “treasurer” means the county treasurer when used with reference to a county and the city treasurer when used with reference to a city. “Treasurer” also includes any person or officer who has charge and makes payments of the funds of such county or city, respectively.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

31506.

A city may:

(a) Acquire, by condemnation, purchase, gift, lease, or any other means, property necessary or convenient for use as parking places, including any property necessary or convenient for the opening, widening, straightening, or extending of streets or alleys necessary or convenient for ingress to or egress from any parking place.

(b) Improve any property by the construction thereon of garages, buildings, or other improvements necessary or convenient for parking purposes.

(c) Improve parking places and any property necessary or convenient for ingress to or egress from parking places.

(d) Administer, maintain, operate, and repair parking places.

(e) Collect fees or charges to pay all or any part of the cost of improving, repairing, maintaining, and operating parking places and of acquiring and improving additional parking places.

(f) Levy taxes to pay all or any part of the cost of improving, repairing, maintaining, and operating parking places and of acquiring and improving additional parking places.

(g) Employ engineers, attorneys, and other persons necessary or convenient for the doing of any act authorized by this part.

(h) Do all acts and things necessary or convenient for the accomplishment of the purposes of this part. The enumeration of specific authority in this part does not limit in any way the general authority granted by this subdivision.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

31516.

Whenever any official or board designated in this part is not and cannot be provided for by a charter city, all acts to be done by such official or board pursuant to this part shall be done and performed by, and all jurisdiction and authority given by this part to such official or board shall be vested in, the official, board, or other body of the charter city empowered by the charter to perform such acts and exercise such jurisdiction and authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31517.

This part does not affect any other law relating to the same or any similar subject, but provides an alternative authority and procedure for the subject to which it relates. When proceeding under this part, its provisions only need be followed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31518.

This part shall be liberally construed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31519.

The Improvement Act of 1911, the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913, and the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 may be used by a city for the purposes of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.1. Use of City Lands as Parking Places [31580. - 31582.]

31580.

As used in this chapter, “city lands” means lands owned by the city and which are either being used for the purpose of public offstreet parking or are not needed by the city for any other purpose and are available for such use.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

31581.

The legislative body, at any time, may declare and agree that city lands shall be held, used, and treated in all respects the same as parking places acquired with the proceeds of collections of paid assessments and bonds issued pursuant to Section 31519. The city shall, in the resolution of intention, describe the city lands to be so held, used, and treated and shall state the amount of compensation, if any, to be paid the city therefor and the manner in which such compensation is to be paid.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

31582.

The legislative body may increase, decrease, eliminate, change, or otherwise modify the lands to be so held, used, and treated, the improvements to be made or constructed thereon, or the compensation to be paid the city for such city lands, in the same manner and by the same procedure as is provided for increasing, decreasing, changing, or otherwise modifying the acquisitions and improvements to be made under this part.
